District of Columbia statutes.
50-2421.01

Short title.

This subchapter may be cited as the “Removal and Disposition of Abandoned and other Unlawfully Parked Vehicles Reform Act of 2003.”

Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-35, § 1, 50 DCR 6579
This section is referenced in § 50-2624.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see §§ 2 to 12, 14, 15, of Removal and Disposition of Abandoned and Other Unlawfully Parked Vehicles Reform Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-171, October 6, 2003, 50 DCR 9163).